Idaho, session 2025, S1189.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 48, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4806, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4806. LIMITATION OF DISTRIBUTION -- WAIVER OF IMMUNITY. (1)
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a human gene therapy
product for any infectious disease indication shall not be distributed,
sold, or administered in this state unless the manufacturer of such human
gene therapy product affirmatively waives any immunity from suit for an
injury arising from a design defect of the human gene therapy product, in-
cluding immunity granted pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 300aa-1, et seq.
(2) A manufacturer of a human gene therapy product for any infectious
disease indication that is distributed, sold, or administered within this
state shall be deemed to have waived any immunity from suit for injuries
caused by a design defect of the human gene therapy product, including immu-
nity granted pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 300aa-1, et seq.
(3) For the purpose of this section, "human gene therapy product" means
all products that mediate their effects by transcription or translation of
transferred genetic material or by specifically altering human genetic se-
quences. Human gene therapy products include but are not limited to:
(a) Nucleic acids, such as plasmids and in vitro transcribed ribonu-
cleic acid;
(b) Genetically modified microorganisms, such as viruses, bacteria,
and fungi;
(c) Engineered site-specific nucleases used for human genome editing;
and
(d) Ex vivo genetically modified human cells.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.